Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1718
Mobile massage therapy establishment; application; floor plan or blueprint.

Any person seeking a license to operate a mobile massage therapy establishment shall submit a completed application to the department, and along with the application, the applicant shall submit a detailed floor plan or blueprint of the proposed establishment sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of section 38-1717.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 7.